Rhode Island statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 18 Elective Meetings

17-18-1.
Warning and organization of town elective meetings.

Town meetings for purposes of election shall be warned and organized as is or may be provided by law for the warning and organization of town meetings for other purposes, unless specially directed otherwise, and shall be held at the times appointed by law.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 22.

17-18-2.
Warning and organization of ward elective meetings.

Ward meetings in cities for purposes of election shall be warned and organized as is or may be provided by law or by the charters of the cities, and all meetings shall be held at the times appointed by law; provided, that in the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, Central Falls, Newport, Cranston, Woonsocket, and Warwick, the meetings shall be warned by the local boards.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 2; P.L. 1908, ch. 1608, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 2; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; P.L. 1916, ch. 1422, § 3; P.L. 1920, ch. 1975, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 2; P.L. 1926, ch. 924, § 3; P.L. 1927, ch. 1085, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-2

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-18-3.
Warning and organization of senatorial district, representative district, and voting district meetings.

Senatorial district meetings, representative district meetings, and voting district meetings for the purposes of election shall be warned and organized as is or may be provided by law, and notice of all these meetings shall be given by the city or town clerk issuing his or her warrant, directed to the town sergeant or one of the constables of that city or town, or in the event that the town sergeant or a constable is not available, to any member of the town or city clerk’s office or member of the board of canvassers, directing him or her to post, at least seven (7) days before the day appointed for these meetings, written notifications in one or more public places in each voting district, and in each senatorial and representative district not divided into voting districts, of the time when, and place where, each meeting is to be held, and of the business required by law to be transacted in the meeting, and stating in the warrant the time of the opening and closing of the polls at each elective meeting to be held in that city or town; provided, that the local boards may, at their discretion, substitute notification by publication in a newspaper having local circulation for notification by posting in public places; and further provided, that in the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, Central Falls, Newport, Cranston, Warwick, and Woonsocket, the notice shall be given and posted by the local board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 3; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; P.L. 1916, ch. 1422, § 3; P.L. 1920, ch. 1975, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 3; P.L. 1926, ch. 924, § 3; P.L. 1927, ch. 1085, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 3; P.L. 1956, ch. 3697, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-3

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 14; P.L. 1994, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 41, § 1, effective June 8, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 42, § 1, effective June 8, 2022.

17-18-4.
Return of warrant.

The officer charged with the service of the warrant shall, previous to the meetings, make return to the respective district clerks of his or her actions upon the warrant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 13; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 4; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-4

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-18-5.
Date of general elective meetings.

A meeting of the electors of every city, town, senatorial district, representative district, and of every voting district shall be held biennially in the even years on the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November at a place to be designated and furnished by the local boards of the respective towns and cities at the expense of the towns and cities, respectively, for the purpose of organization and voting for general officers, senators and representatives in the general assembly, representatives in congress, and electors of president and vice-president of the United States, if to be chosen, and for any other officers that are to be chosen on that day.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 4; P.L. 1901, ch. 808, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 7; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-5

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 14.

17-18-5.1.
Elections falling on religious holiday.

In the event that the date for the holding of any state or municipal election, other than the general election held on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in even numbered years, falls upon the day of a religious holiday on which the doctrines of a faith would prohibit its followers from voting, the election shall be held upon the next business day other than Saturday then following; provided, that nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to invalidate any election once it has been held.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 51, § 1.

17-18-6.
District moderator and clerk.

The officers of a voting district shall be a moderator and a clerk. The moderator shall preside in all meetings of his or her district until his or her successor is elected and qualified. The moderator shall have the same authority in these meetings as moderators of town meetings have, and shall be subject to the same penalties for willful violation or neglect of duty. The clerk shall keep a record of the proceedings of the meetings in his or her district, and, after a choice of officers in his or her district, shall, in writing duly certified, notify the town or city clerk of the choice; provided, that in the cities of Providence, Pawtucket, Central Falls, Newport, Cranston, Woonsocket, and Warwick, the notification shall be made to the local board.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, §§ 7, 8, 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, §§ 7, 8, 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 8; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; P.L. 1916, ch. 1422, § 3; P.L. 1920, ch. 1975, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 8; P.L. 1926, ch. 924, § 3; P.L. 1927, ch. 1085, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-6

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 14.

17-18-7.
Place and time of district elective meetings — Moderator and clerks as quorum.

Voting district meetings shall be held by the electors of the district at the times appointed by law and at the places designated by the local board of the respective cities and towns; and the moderator and clerk, when present, shall constitute a quorum of electors for the opening of the polls for voting for all civil officers, except for moderator and clerk.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 3; G.L. ch. 9, § 6; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 14.

17-18-8.
Town and elective meetings continuously open for voting.

All town meetings and elective meetings for the election of general officers, senators and representatives in the general assembly, representatives in congress, and electors of president and vice-president of the United States, shall be opened at a specified hour in the morning and shall be continuously kept open for voting until a specified hour in the afternoon, as provided in §§

17-18-10

and

17-18-11

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 9; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; P.L. 1917, ch. 1519, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-8

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-18-9.
District meetings open whole day.

In the election of general officers, representatives in congress, and electors of president and vice-president of the United States, and of city officers of all cities, and in the election of senators and representatives in the general assembly, the town, ward, senatorial and representative district, and voting district meetings of the several cities and towns, shall be kept open for voting during the whole time of voting for the day.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 5; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-9

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 14.

17-18-10.
Time of opening of polls.

Elective meetings in the cities and towns named in this section shall be opened for the purpose of voting at the hours specified for each particular city or town as designated in the specific time as follows:

Barrington Polls open at 7 a.m (2) Bristol Polls open at 7 a.m (3) Burrillville Polls open at 7 a.m (4) Central Falls Polls open at 7 a.m (5) Charlestown Polls open at 7 a.m (6) Coventry Polls open at 7 a.m (7) Cranston Polls open at 7 a.m (8) Cumberland Polls open at 7 a.m (9) East Greenwich Polls open at 7 a.m (10) East Providence Polls open at 7 a.m (11) Exeter Polls open at 7 a.m (12) Foster Polls open at 7 a.m (13) Glocester Polls open at 7 a.m (14) Hopkinton Polls open at 7 a.m (15) Jamestown Polls open at 7 a.m (16) Johnston Polls open at 7 a.m (17) Lincoln Polls open at 7 a.m (18) Little Compton Polls open at 7 a.m (19) Middletown Polls open at 7 a.m (20) Narragansett Polls open at 7 a.m (21) Newport Polls open at 7 a.m (22) New Shoreham Polls open at 7 a.m (23) North Kingstown Polls open at 7 a.m (24) North Providence Polls open at 7 a.m (25) North Smithfield Polls open at 7 a.m (26) Pawtucket Polls open at 7 a.m (27) Portsmouth Polls open at 7 a.m (28) Providence Polls open at 7 a.m (29) Richmond Polls open at 7 a.m (30) Scituate Polls open at 7 a.m (31) Smithfield Polls open at 7 a.m (32) South Kingstown Polls open at 7 a.m (33) Tiverton Polls open at 7 a.m (34) Warren Polls open at 7 a.m (35) Warwick Polls open at 7 a.m (36) Westerly Polls open at 7 a.m (37) West Greenwich Polls open at 7 a.m (38) West Warwick Polls open at 7 a.m (39) Woonsocket Polls open at 7 a.m

[Deleted by P.L. 2019, ch. 201, § 1 and P.L. 2019, ch. 268, § 1.]

In all presidential preference primaries in the town of New Shoreham, polls shall open at 12:00 p.m.

Notice shall be given and posted by the local board.

Click to view

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, §§ 15, 18, 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, §§ 15, 18, 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, §§ 9, 10; P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; P.L. 1912, ch. 781, § 1; P.L. 1917, ch. 1519, § 1; P.L. 1919, ch. 1774, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2191, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 10; P.L. 1924, ch. 554, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 744, § 6; P.L. 1926, ch. 762, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1334, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1598, § 1; P.L. 1933, ch. 2041, § 1; P.L. 1934, ch. 2102, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2395, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2603, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 10; P.L. 1942, ch. 1210, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1399, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1413, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1427, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3057, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3102, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3122, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3445, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3505, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-10

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 22, § 1; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 72, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 9, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 157, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 276, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 4, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 1972, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 273, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 10, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 216, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 614, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 51, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 40, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 230, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 532, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 114, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 27, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 145, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 151, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 36, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 68, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 410, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 459, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 502, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 362, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 189, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 302, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 449, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 113, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 294, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 268, § 1.

17-18-11.
Time of closing of polls.

Elective meetings in all cities and towns shall be continuously kept open for voting until 8 p.m.; provided, that any qualified voter who is waiting in line to vote at 8 p.m. shall be entitled to cast his or her vote. When all persons entitled to vote have been afforded a reasonable opportunity to do so, the polls shall be closed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, §§ 16, 17, 19, 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, §§ 16, 17, 19, 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, §§ 9, 11, as enacted by P.L. 1910, ch. 640, § 3; P.L. 1912, ch. 781, § 2; P.L. 1917, ch. 1519, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1625, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2023, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 11; P.L. 1924, ch. 554, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 607, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 744, § 6; P.L. 1933, ch. 2064, § 1; P.L. 1934, ch. 2102, § 2; P.L. 1935, ch. 2221, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2288, § 1; P.L. 1936, ch. 2395, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 11; P.L. 1939, ch. 755, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1210, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1399, § 2; P.L. 1944, ch. 1402, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1413, § 2; P.L. 1946, ch. 1707, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2445, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2480, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2489, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2526, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2770, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3445, § 2; P.L. 1955, ch. 3468, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3578, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3774, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-11

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 22, § 2; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1959, ch. 6, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 1961, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 179, § 2; P.L. 1964, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 5, § 2; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 14; P.L. 1997, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 62, § 1.

17-18-12.
Adjournment of ward and district meetings.

In cities other than the city of Providence, and in towns divided into voting districts, ward and district meetings held in those cities and towns, respectively, for the election of city, town, ward, and voting district officers, or any of them, shall, at the time of the closing the polls prescribed by law, stand adjourned to the seventh (7th) day next from and after the appointed day unless the seventh (7th) day falls on a legal or religious holiday, and in that event to the day following the holiday, with like adjournment from the holiday; provided, that there shall be no election held on Saturday, and if the day of any adjournment falls on Saturday, the meeting shall stand adjourned to the Monday following, unless that Monday is a legal or religious holiday, in which case the adjourned election shall proceed on the next following day which is not a legal or religious holiday.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 829, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 10, § 16; G.L. 1923, ch. 10, § 16; G.L. 1938, ch. 315, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-12

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 116, § 14.

17-18-13.
Reopening of town elective meetings — Certificates.

If, in any case in a town not divided into voting districts, there is no election of the town officers voted for who are required to be elected by the people, or of any of them, the polls may be reopened and proceedings shall be had until an election takes place. In those towns, after the declaration of the result of the voting for town officers, the town clerks shall give certificates of their election to the persons elected town officers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1901, ch. 829, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 10, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 10, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 315, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-13

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1.

17-18-14.
Application to elections conducted on optical scan precinct count voting system.

The provisions of this chapter shall govern elective meetings held in accordance with the provisions of chapter 19 of this title, provided they are applicable and not inconsistent with the provisions of chapter 19.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 9, § 22; G.L. 1896, ch. 9, § 12; P.L. 1901, ch. 640, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 9, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 314, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

17-18-14

; P.L. 1958, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 277, § 11; P.L. 1996, ch. 298, § 11.

17-18-15.
Closing of schools.

At each general election as defined in §

17-1-2(2)

and statewide primary as defined in §

17-15-1

, all public elementary and secondary schools throughout the state shall not be in session. On the day of the general election and statewide primary, the use of school buildings or premises shall be restricted to use only as polling places for election purposes. Notwithstanding the previous provisions, school staff development days may be held. Provided further, that the provisions of this section shall not be applicable to the Block Island School, located in the town of New Shoreham, and the use of the Block Island School shall not be restricted, nor shall classes need to be cancelled or postponed at said school, on the day of general elections and statewide primaries.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 271, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 187, § 3; P.L. 2006, ch. 352, § 3; P.L. 2008, ch. 283, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 363, § 1.